Arkansas, session 2025, SB609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 80, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-80-105. Right of minor to consult with parent or legal guardian —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “minor” means a person who is under
eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) A minor shall have the opportunity to consult with his or her
parent or legal guardian in person, by telephone, or by video conference
before:
(1) A custodial interrogation of the minor takes place; or
(2) The minor waives his or her right to:
(A) Refuse to answer questions or incriminate himself or
herself; and
(B) To have an attorney:
*LJH298*
04/02/2025 1:22:05 PM LJH298

SB609
(i) Present during a custodial interrogation; and
(ii) Appointed to represent the minor if he or she
cannot afford an attorney.
(c) A minor's right to consult with a parent or legal guardian under
subsection (b) of this section shall not be waived by the minor.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, any
statements obtained from a minor in violation of this section shall be
inadmissible in a delinquency or criminal proceeding unless the prosecuting
attorney proves by clear and convincing evidence that the statement was made
knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily.
(e) This section does not prevent a statement of a minor obtained
during a custodial interrogation of the minor from being admissible as
evidence if the law enforcement officer who questions the minor:
(1) Reasonably believes that the information he or she sought is
necessary to protect another person from an imminent threat to the person's
life; and
(2) Limits his or her questions to those that are reasonably
necessary to protect another person from an imminent threat to the person's
life.

















04/02/2025 1:22:05 PM LJH298